Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,150
Truck-tractor and semitrailer; commercial trailer; registration fee.

For registration purposes, a truck-tractor and semitrailer unit and a commercial trailer shall be considered as separate units. The registration fee of the truck-tractor shall be the fee provided for commercial motor vehicles. Each semitrailer and each commercial trailer shall be registered upon the payment of a fee of one dollar. The department shall provide an appropriate license plate or, when appropriate, validation decal to identify such semitrailers. If any truck or truck-tractor, operated under the classification designated as local, farm, or A or with plates issued under section 60-3,113 is operated outside of the limits of its respective classification, it shall thereupon come under the classification of commercial motor vehicle.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 150;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 51.